Colorado statutes. TITLE 42 VEHICLES AND TRAFFIC
PART 1 DRIVERS' LICENSES
42-2-118. Renewal of license in person or by mail - donations to Emily Keyes - John W. Buckner organ and tissue donation awareness fund - repeal.

Every license issued under section 42-2-114 or part 5 of this article 2 is renewable prior to its expiration, upon application in person, by mail as provided in subsection (1.3) of this section, or by electronic means as provided in subsection (1.5) of this section; payment of the required fee; passing of an eye test; passing of such other examinations as the applicant's physical limitations or driver's record indicates to be desirable; and payment of any penalty assessment, fine, cost, or forfeiture as prescribed by subsection (3) of this section. If a person renews his or her license pursuant to this subsection (1)(a)(I) by electronic means, the person must attest under penalty of perjury that he or she has had an eye examination by an optometrist or an ophthalmologist within three years before the date of application.
(1) (a) (I) Every license issued under section 42-2-114 or part 5 of this article 2 is renewable prior to its expiration, upon application in person, by mail as provided in subsection (1.3) of this section, or by electronic means as provided in subsection (1.5) of this section; payment of the required fee; passing of an eye test; passing of such other examinations as the applicant's physical limitations or driver's record indicates to be desirable; and payment of any penalty assessment, fine, cost, or forfeiture as prescribed by subsection (3) of this section. If a person renews his or her license pursuant to this subsection (1)(a)(I) by electronic means, the person must attest under penalty of perjury that he or she has had an eye examination by an optometrist or an ophthalmologist within three years before the date of application.

An applicant may make a donation of one dollar or more to the Emily Keyes - John W. Buckner organ and tissue donation awareness fund, created in section 42-2-107 (4)(b)(II), to promote the donation of organs and tissues under the provisions of the "Revised Uniform Anatomical Gift Act", part 2 of article 19 of title 15. The department shall collect the donations and transmit them to the state treasurer, who shall credit the same to the Emily Keyes - John W. Buckner organ and tissue donation awareness fund. The donation prescribed in this subsection (1)(a)(II)(A) is voluntary and may be refused by the applicant. The department shall make available informational booklets or other informational sources on the importance of organ and tissue donations to applicants as designed and approved by the advisory body created under section 42-2-107 (4)(b)(III)(A). The department shall inquire of each applicant at the time the completed application is presented whether the applicant is interested in making a donation of one dollar or more to the fund. If the applicant has not already made a donor designation, the department shall also specifically inform the applicant of the option for organ and tissue donations by having a "Y" placed in the donor field on the front of the document. The department shall advise each applicant volunteering to become an organ and tissue donor that the applicant's name shall be transmitted to the organ and tissue donor registry authorized in section 15-19-220, and that the applicant shall notify the federally designated organ procurement organization of any changes to the applicant's donation.

This subsection (1)(a)(II) is repealed, effective September 1, 2027.

A license issued under section 42-2-114 that, at the time of its expiration, is held by a resident of this state who is temporarily outside of this state or is prevented by disability from complying with subsection (1)(a) of this section may be extended for a period of one year if the licensee applies to the department for an extension of the expiration date prior to the date the license expires and pays a fee set by the department in accordance with section 42-2-114.5 (2).
(b) (I) (A) A license issued under section 42-2-114 that, at the time of its expiration, is held by a resident of this state who is temporarily outside of this state or is prevented by disability from complying with subsection (1)(a) of this section may be extended for a period of one year if the licensee applies to the department for an extension of the expiration date prior to the date the license expires and pays a fee set by the department in accordance with section 42-2-114.5 (2).

A license issued under part 5 of this article 2 that, at the time of its expiration, is held by a resident of this state who is prevented by disability from complying with subsection (1)(a) of this section may be extended for a period of one year if the licensee applies to the department for an extension of the expiration date prior to the date the license expires and pays a fee set by the department in accordance with section 42-2-114.5 (2).

The department shall transfer the fees paid in accordance with this subsection (1)(b) to the state treasurer, who shall credit them to the licensing services cash fund, created in section 42-2-114.5 (1). The extensions authorized in this subsection (1)(b) become null and void ninety days after the licensee renews his or her residency in the state or otherwise becomes able to comply with subsection (1)(a) of this section. The department shall grant no more than one extension under this subsection (1)(b) unless a resident of this state, other than a resident who had been issued a license under part 5 of this article 2, is temporarily residing in a foreign country, in which case the department may grant no more than two one-year extensions.

A surcharge of one dollar shall be added to any extension sought for a license for which a motorcycle endorsement is requested which shall be credited to the motorcycle operator safety training fund created in section 43-5-504, C.R.S.

(1.3) (a) The department may, in its discretion, allow renewal of a driver's license issued under section 42-2-114 or 42-2-505 by mail subject to the following requirements:

Renewal by mail shall be available only to drivers twenty-one years of age or older;

Renewal by mail shall only be available every other driver's license renewal period as provided in section 42-2-114 (2)(a) and (3) or 42-2-509 (1);

A person who is less than sixty-six years of age renewing by mail shall attest under penalty of law that he or she has had an eye examination by an optometrist or ophthalmologist within three years before the renewal. A person who is sixty-six years of age or older renewing by mail shall obtain, on a form as required by the department, a signed statement from an optometrist or ophthalmologist attesting that he or she has had an eye examination within the last six months and attesting to the results of the applicant's eye examination; and

A person renewing by mail who requires vision correction shall attest under penalty of law to his or her prescription for vision correction.

Every applicant for renewal of a driver's license by mail shall submit the following to the department:

Payment of the required fee;

Repealed.

Payment of any penalty assessment, fine, cost, or forfeiture as prescribed by subsection (3) of this section.

The department may promulgate rules necessary for the implementation of this subsection (1.3).

(1.5) (a) The department may, in its discretion, allow renewal of a driver's license issued under section 42-2-114 or 42-2-505 by electronic means subject to the following requirements:

Electronic renewal shall be available only to drivers twenty-one years of age or older and less than sixty-six years of age;

A person may renew a driver's license electronically only for two consecutive driver's license renewal periods as provided in section 42-2-114 (2)(a) and (3) or 42-2-509 (1);

A person renewing electronically shall attest under penalty of law that he or she has had an eye examination by an optometrist or ophthalmologist within three years before the renewal; and

A person renewing electronically who requires vision correction shall attest under penalty of law to his or her prescription for vision correction.

Pursuant to sections 24-19.5-103 (3) and 29-11.5-103 (3), C.R.S., the department shall not allow any third-party charges that may be assessed to complete the electronic transaction to reduce the amount of revenue that would otherwise be required to be distributed to the highway users tax fund or the licensing services cash fund.

Every applicant for renewal of a driver's license by electronic means shall submit the following to the department:

Payment of the required fee; and

Payment of any penalty assessment, fine, cost, or forfeiture as prescribed by subsection (3) of this section.

To implement electronic renewal of a driver's license pursuant to this section, the department shall:

Submit to the office of information technology created in the office of the governor for review and approval the department's plan for the renewal of a driver's license by electronic means;

Develop and implement electronic renewal of a driver's license in a manner that is consistent with the nation's policy on national security and in conformance with federal and state law for homeland security;

Develop and implement an information security program and utilize a layered security approach, which shall consist of the following:

A business impact analysis that assesses the criticality of services;

A risk or security assessment that identifies vulnerabilities of the system;

A risk management process;

A contingency plan for disaster recovery of information and services and business continuity;

Procedures that identify security safeguards for asset protection;

A secure architectural design;

Security awareness and training programs; and

Monitoring and audit systems for back-end reviews to evaluate efficiency and efficacy;

Develop security policies that address, at a minimum, the following:

System protection from viruses and system virus detection;

Firewall security;

Logging capability;

Server security;

Intrusion detection;

Encryption;

Physical security; and

Secure remote access communication, if applicable; and

Develop a migration plan that sets out the department's goals and objectives and establishes priorities and the department's timeline for achieving such requirements.

Failure to comply with the requirements of paragraph (d) of this subsection (1.5) may result in the department being removed from or denied access to the state network or mainframe computer until all of the provisions of paragraph (d) of this subsection (1.5) are demonstrated by the department.

Repealed.

The department may promulgate any necessary rules for the implementation of this subsection (1.5).

Every license referred to in this section which is at the time of its expiration, as provided in subsection (1) of this section, held by a member of the armed forces of the United States, then serving on active duty outside of this state, shall not expire as provided in subsection (1) of this section, but such expiration date shall be extended for a period of three years or until ninety days after such licensee returns to this state, whichever occurs first.

Prior to the renewal of a permanent driver's license or the issuance or renewal of a probationary license, the department shall determine if the applicant has any outstanding judgments or warrants entered or issued against the applicant or if the applicant has issued a check or order to the department for the payment of a penalty assessment and such check or order was returned for insufficient funds or a closed account and remains unpaid as set forth in section 42-4-1709 (7).
(3) (a) (I) Prior to the renewal of a permanent driver's license or the issuance or renewal of a probationary license, the department shall determine if the applicant has any outstanding judgments or warrants entered or issued against the applicant or if the applicant has issued a check or order to the department for the payment of a penalty assessment and such check or order was returned for insufficient funds or a closed account and remains unpaid as set forth in section 42-4-1709 (7).

For the purposes of this subsection (3), "outstanding judgments or warrants" does not include any judgment or warrant reported to the department in violation of the provisions of section 42-4-110.5 (2)(c).

If there are no outstanding judgments or warrants entered or issued against the applicant and the applicant has not issued a check or order to the department that was returned for insufficient funds or a closed account and that remains unpaid as set forth in section 42-4-1709 (7) and if all other conditions for renewal pursuant to articles 1 to 4 of this title are met, the department shall renew the applicant's permanent driver's license.

If there are no outstanding judgments or warrants entered or issued against the applicant and the defendant has not issued a check or order to the department that was returned for insufficient funds or a closed account and that remains unpaid as set forth in section 42-4-1709 (7) and if all other conditions for renewal pursuant to articles 1 to 4 of this title are met, the department may issue or renew the applicant's probationary license.

If the department determines that the applicant is subject to the requirements of section 42-4-1709 (7), the permanent driver's license shall not be renewed or the probationary license may not be issued or renewed until such applicant has complied with said section. Any person who pays any outstanding judgments, who has any warrants entered, or who makes payment for a check or order to the department that had been returned for insufficient funds or a closed account pursuant to section 42-4-1709 (7) shall pay to the court or to the department a thirty-dollar administrative processing cost for each such judgment, warrant, check, or order in addition to all other penalties, costs, or forfeitures. If the court collects an administrative processing fee, the court shall remit fifty percent of the administrative processing fee to the department of revenue, and the other fifty percent of that fee is to be retained by the issuing court. If the department collects an administrative processing fee, the department shall retain the fee.

Beginning January 1, 1986, the executive director shall ascertain whether the administrative fee established in paragraph (c) of this subsection (3) adequately compensates the department for administration of this subsection (3).

The department of revenue shall coordinate the design and implementation of the necessary delinquency notification forms, satisfaction forms, and time requirements for utilization of such forms by the courts.

There shall be a twenty-day period to appeal any penalty under this section when it can be shown by the applicant or defendant that sufficient funds were in the financial institution and the error was that of the financial institution. In this event the department shall review the documentation and, if it was the fault of the financial institution that the check or order was returned, no penalty or fee shall be imposed.

Notwithstanding the amount specified for any fee in this section, the executive director of the department by rule or as otherwise provided by law may reduce the amount of one or more of the fees if necessary pursuant to section 24-75-402 (3), C.R.S., to reduce the uncommitted reserves of the fund to which all or any portion of one or more of the fees is credited. After the uncommitted reserves of the fund are sufficiently reduced, the executive director of the department by rule or as otherwise provided by law may increase the amount of one or more of the fees as provided in section 24-75-402 (4), C.R.S.

Source:

L. 94:

(1)(a) amended, p. 694, § 1, effective July 1; entire title amended with relocations, p. 2125, § 1, effective January 1, 1995.

L. 96:

(1)(a) amended, p. 1134, § 2, effective July 1; (3)(a), (3)(b), and (3)(c) amended, p. 1203, § 2, effective July 1.

L. 97:

(1)(a)(I) amended and (1.3) added, p. 141, § 2, effective March 28; (3)(a) amended, p. 1669, § 3, effective June 5; (3)(a) to (3)(c) amended and (3)(f) added, p. 1382, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 98:

(1)(a)(II) amended, p. 1174, § 10, effective June 1; (4) added, p. 1352, § 96, effective June 1.

L. 2000:

(1)(a)(II) amended, p. 732, § 11, effective July 1; (1.3)(b)(II)(B) added by revision, pp. 1342, 1362, §§ 4, 49.

L. 2002:

(3)(d) amended, p. 869, § 2, effective August 7.

L. 2004:

(1)(a)(I) and (1.3)(a)(II) amended and (1.5) added, p. 1268, § 1, effective May 28.

L. 2005:

(1.3)(a)(I) amended and (1.3)(a)(III) and (1.3)(a)(IV) added, p. 645, § 10, effective May 27.

L. 2006:

(1.5)(d)(I) amended, p. 1737, § 27, effective June 6.

L. 2007:

(1)(a)(II) amended, p. 309, § 2, effective March 30; (1.5)(d)(I) amended, p. 918, § 20, effective May 17; (1)(a)(II)(A) amended, p. 800, § 11, effective July 1.

L. 2008:

(1.3)(a)(I), (1.3)(a)(II), (1.3)(a)(III), and (1.5)(a) amended, p. 629, § 1, effective August 5; (1.5)(f) repealed, p. 1915, § 135, effective August 5.

L. 2009:

(1.5)(b) amended, (SB 09-274), ch. 210, p. 953, § 5, effective May 1.

L. 2014:

(1)(b)(I) and (1.5)(a)(II) amended, (SB 14-194), ch. 346, p. 1546, § 10, effective June 5.

L. 2017:

(1)(a)(II)(A) amended, (SB 17-223), ch. 158, p. 565, § 19, effective August 9; (1)(a)(II) amended, (HB 17-1027), ch. 329, p. 1761, § 2, effective September 15.

L. 2018:

(1)(a)(I), (1)(b)(I), IP(1.3)(a), (1.3)(a)(II), IP(1.5)(a), and (1.5)(a)(II) amended, (SB 18-108), ch. 260, p. 1596, § 5, effective January 1, 2019.

42-2-119. Notices - change of address or name.

Whenever any person, after applying for or receiving a driver's license or identification card, moves from the address named in such application or in the license or identification card issued to such person or when the name of the licensee is changed, such person shall, within thirty days, provide notice to the department of such person's old and new address and the number of any license or identification card held by such person. Such notice shall be provided to the department in writing or in electronic form on the department's official website. A licensee who changes his or her name shall, within thirty days, apply in person to renew such license pursuant to section

42-2-118

and in compliance with sections

42-2-107

and

42-2-305

.

Repealed. / (Deleted by amendment,

L. 2005, p. 645

, § 11, effective May 27, 2005.)

All notices and orders required to be given to any licensee or registered owner under the provisions of the motor vehicle laws shall be in writing; and, if mailed, postpaid by first-class mail, to him or her at the last-known address shown by the records kept by the department pursuant to this article. Such mailing shall be sufficient notice in accord with the motor vehicle laws. Any notice or order of the department mailed first-class under the provisions of this title creates a presumption for administrative purposes that such notice or order was received if the department maintains a copy of the notice or order and maintains a certification that the notice or order was deposited in the United States mail by an employee of the department. Evidence of a copy of the notice mailed to the last-known address of the licensee as shown by the records kept by the department pursuant to this article and a certification of mailing by a department employee, or evidence of delivery of notice in person to the last-known address of the licensee as shown by the records kept by the department pursuant to this article, or evidence of personal service upon the licensee or upon any attorney appearing on the licensee's behalf of the order of denial, cancellation, suspension, or revocation of the license by the executive director of the department, or by the executive director's duly authorized representative, is prima facie proof that the licensee received personal notice of said denial, cancellation, suspension, or revocation.

(2.5) Repealed.

Any person who violates subsection (1) of this section commits a class B traffic infraction.

Source:

L. 94:

Entire title amended with relocations, p. 2126, § 1, effective January 1, 1995.

L. 98:

(1) amended, p. 1102, § 23, effective June 1.

L. 99:

(1)(b) amended, p. 996, § 2, effective May 29.

L. 2000:

(2) amended, p. 1640, § 24, effective June 1.

L. 2005:

(1) and (2) amended, p. 645, § 11, effective May 27; (1)(b) repealed, p. 1172, § 6, effective August 8.

L. 2010:

(1)(a) amended and (2.5) added, (HB 10-1045), ch. 317, p. 1479, § 3, effective July 1, 2011.

L. 2017:

(2.5) repealed, (HB 17-1107), ch. 101, p. 366, § 9, effective August 9.

42-2-120. Methods of service.

Any notice or order required to be served under the provisions of the motor vehicle laws may be served in any manner reasonably designed to notify the person to be served of the material provisions of such notice or order. A person has been served with a notice or order when such person has knowledge of the material provisions of such notice or order, regardless of the manner in which such knowledge was acquired. Any irregularity in the form or manner of service or documentation of the proof of service or the means by which knowledge of the material provisions of a notice or order is acquired shall not affect the validity of such notice or order.

For purposes of notices or orders relating to driving restraints only, "material provisions" means those provisions which identify the affected person, and those provisions which state that a restraint against the person's license or privilege to drive in this state has been, or will be, entered on the records of the department, or those provisions which advise the person that he or she has a right to request a hearing regarding the imposition of a restraint against such person's license or privilege to drive.

The department shall develop proof of service forms which may be used to document proof of service under this subsection (3). Such forms shall include but need not be limited to the following:

The name and date of birth of the person served;

The date and time of service;

The identification number of the notice or order served, if any, or, in the event the notice or order is not available, a description of the information relayed to the person served;

The name, title, signature, and employing agency of the person making service;

The signature of the person served; and

The right index fingerprint of the person served.

In addition to service by mail or any other means, service of notices or orders may be personally made by any employee of the department, any peace officer, any municipal, county, or state prosecutor, or any municipal, county or district court judge, magistrate, or judicial officer. If service is personally made under this subsection (4), proof of such service of any notice or order may be made by sending a written notification of service in any form to the department. Such notification shall be an official record of the department under section 42-2-121. It shall not be necessary that the written notification is on a form supplied by the department, but the department may refuse to accept as an official record a written notification which does not provide substantially the same information as specified in subsection (3) of this section.

Peace officers and employees of the department shall serve notices and orders relating to driving restraints upon the affected person anytime the affected person is contacted by a peace officer or employee of the department, when such peace officer or employee believes that the affected person may not have been previously personally served with any notice or order affecting such person's license or privilege to drive a motor vehicle in this state.

Source:

L. 94:

Entire title amended with relocations, p. 2127, § 1, effective January 1, 1995.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 42-2-117.5 as it existed prior to 1994, and the former § 42-2-120 was relocated to § 42-2-123.

42-2-121. Records to be kept by department - admission of records in court.

The department shall file every completed application for a license received by it and shall maintain suitable indexes containing in alphabetical order:

All applications denied and on each thereof note the reasons for such denial;

All applications granted; and

The name of every licensee whose license has been suspended or revoked by the department and after each such name note the reasons for such action in each case.

The department shall also file all accident reports, abstracts of court records of convictions received by it under the laws of this state, departmental actions, suspensions, restrictions, revocations, denials, cancellations, reinstatements, and other permanent records and, in connection therewith, maintain a driver's history by making suitable notations in order that an individual record of each licensee showing the convictions of such licensee, the departmental actions, and the traffic accidents in which the licensee has been involved, except those accidents not resulting in a conviction and those traffic violations which occur outside of the boundaries of this state, shall be readily ascertainable and available for the consideration of the department upon any application for renewal of license and at other suitable times.

The department shall also keep a separate file of all abstracts of court records of dismissals of DUI, DUI per se, DWAI, and UDD charges and all abstracts of records in cases where the original charges were for DUI, DUI per se, DWAI, and UDD and the convictions were for nonalcohol- or nondrug-related traffic offenses. This file shall be made available only to criminal justice agencies, as defined in section 24-72-302 (3), C.R.S.

The following records and documents filed with, maintained by, or prepared by the department are official records and documents of the state of Colorado:

Accident reports;

Abstracts of court records of convictions received by the department under the laws of the state of Colorado;

Records of and documents relating to departmental actions pertaining to the driving privileges of any person concerning licensing, restrictions, probationary conditions, suspensions, revocations, denials, cancellations, or reinstatements of such driving privileges;

Records of and documents relating to the status of any person's privilege to drive a vehicle in the state of Colorado on a specific date or dates;

Drivers' histories;

Records of and documents relating to the identification of persons, including, but not limited to, photographs, fingerprints, handwriting, physical features, physical characteristics, dates of birth, and addresses;

Records of and documents relating to the ownership, registration, transfer, and licensing of vehicles;

All other records and documents required by law or rule and regulation to be kept by the department;

Written summaries and data compilations, if prepared by the department from records and documents filed with, maintained by, or prepared by the department, as defined in sub-subparagraphs (A) to (H) of this subparagraph (I);

Written guidelines, procedures, policies, and rules and regulations of the department.

In any trial or hearing, all official records and documents of the state of Colorado, as defined in subparagraph (I) of this paragraph (c), shall be admissible in all municipal, county, and district courts within the state of Colorado without further foundation, shall be statutory exceptions to rule 802 of the Colorado rules of evidence, and shall constitute prima facie proof of the information contained therein, if such record or document is accompanied by a certificate stating that the executive director of the department or the executive director's appointee has custody of such record or document and is accompanied by and attached to a cover page which:

Specifies the number of pages, exclusive of such cover page, which constitutes the record or document being submitted; and

Bears the signature of the executive director of the department or the executive director's appointee attesting to the genuineness of such record or document; and

Bears the official seal of the department or a stamped or printed facsimile of such seal.

For purposes of subparagraph (II) of this paragraph (c), "official records and documents" shall include any mechanically or electronically reproduced copy, photograph, or printout of any record or document or any portion of any record or document filed with, maintained by, or prepared by the department pursuant to this paragraph (c). The department may also permit the electronic transmission of information for direct recording in the department's records and systems. Information transmitted by an electronic means that is approved by the department constitutes an official record for the purposes of this section whether or not an original source document for such information exists or ever existed.

(III.5) The certificate and cover page and its contents required by subparagraph (II) of this paragraph (c) may be electronically produced and transmitted. An electronic reproduction of the certificate and cover page, including an electronic signature of the executive director of the department or of the executive director's appointee and an electronic reproduction of the official seal of the department, shall be admissible in court as provided in subparagraph (II) of this paragraph (c).

For purposes of subparagraph (II) of this paragraph (c), a record or document shall not be required to include every page of a record or document filed with, maintained by, or prepared by the department pursuant to this paragraph (c) to be an official record or document, if such official record or document includes all of those portions of such record or document relevant to the trial or hearing for which it is prepared. There shall be a presumption that such official record or document contains all that is relevant to such trial or hearing.

Notwithstanding the provisions of paragraph (a) of this subsection (2), the department shall not maintain records of convictions of traffic offenses defined in this title for which no points are assessed pursuant to section 42-2-127 (5) other than convictions pursuant to sections 42-2-134, 42-2-138, 42-2-206, and 42-7-422.

Records or documents filed with, maintained by, or prepared by another state that are equivalent to the records maintained in Colorado under paragraph (a) of this subsection (2) shall be admissible in a trial or hearing in accordance with this section.

The department seal required under subsection (2) of this section and under section 42-1-205 may also consist of a rubber stamp producing a facsimile of the seal stamped upon the document.

The department shall place a confidentiality notice on any driver's license application form under section

42-2-107

, driver's license renewal application under section

42-2-118

, duplicate driver's license application under section

42-2-117

, commercial driver's license application under section

42-2-404

, identification card application form under section

42-2-302

, motor vehicle title application form under section

42-6-116

, or motor vehicle registration application form under section

42-3-113

. The department shall indicate in such notice that, unless the person waives his or her confidentiality, the information contained in the person's motor vehicle or driver record shall not be used for any purpose other than a purpose authorized by law.

The department shall prepare a confidentiality waiver form and shall provide the form to the designated agents of the department. The department and the designated agents shall make such form available to any person on request. The department and the designated agents shall be the sole distributors of such form. The form shall contain instructions for filing the form with the department.

to (IV) (Deleted by amendment,

L. 2000, p. 1341

, § 3, effective May 30, 2000.)

Any person executing a waiver under this subsection (4) that information in motor vehicle or driver records may be used for any purpose shall provide the information requested by the department in the confidentiality waiver form and file the form directly with the department. The department shall process such forms and shall notify the designated agents regarding which motor vehicle and driver records are subject to confidentiality waivers.

A confidentiality waiver expires upon a request by the person to rescind the confidentiality waiver or upon the renewal of the motor vehicle or driver record; except that a confidentiality waiver form filed in connection with a motor vehicle registration application shall remain in force until the motor vehicle is transferred or the person requests that the confidentiality waiver be rescinded.

The department shall make reasonable efforts to ensure that confidential records are not visible or accessible to the public and shall establish procedures to protect the contents of the records against inadvertent disclosure.

Upon application by a person, the department shall expunge all records concerning a conviction of a person for UDD with a BAC of at least 0.02 but not more than 0.05 and any records concerning an administrative determination resulting in a revocation under section 42-2-126 (3)(b) or (3)(e) if:

Such person presents a request for expungement to the department and provides all information required by the department to process such request;

Such person is over twenty-one years of age and any department action regarding the offense or administrative determination has been concluded;

The person has not been convicted for any other DUI, DUI per se, DWAI, or UDD offense that was committed while such person was under twenty-one years of age and is not subject to any other administrative determination resulting in a revocation under section 42-2-126 for any other occurrence while such person was under twenty-one years of age;

Such person pays the fine and surcharge for such conviction and completes any other requirements of the court with regard to such conviction, including, but not limited to, any order to pay restitution to any party;

Such person has never held a commercial driver's license as defined in section 42-2-402; and

Such person was not operating a commercial motor vehicle as defined in section 42-2-402.

Upon receiving a request for expungement, the department may delay consideration of the request until sufficient time has elapsed to ensure that the person is not convicted for any additional offense under section 42-4-1301 committed while the person was under twenty-one years of age and that there is no additional administrative determination resulting in a revocation under section 42-2-126 (3)(b) or (3)(e) for actions taken while the person was under twenty-one years of age.

The department shall electronically transmit the name, address, telephone number, date of birth, and gender of each individual who has volunteered to donate organs or tissue upon death on an instructional permit, a minor driver's license, a driver's license, an identification card, or any other license application received by it to the organ and tissue donor registry authorized in section 15-19-220.

Source:

L. 94:

Entire title amended with relocations, p. 2128, § 1, effective January 1, 1995.

L. 96:

(2)(c)(III) amended, p. 637, § 1, effective May 1.

L. 97:

(5) added, p. 1459, § 1, effective July 1; (4) added, p. 1052, § 4, effective September 1.

L. 98:

IP(5)(a) and (5)(a)(III) amended, p. 173, § 1, effective April 6.

L. 2000:

(4) amended, p. 1341, § 3, effective May 30; (6) added, p. 732, § 12, effective July 1.

L. 2001:

(4)(a) amended, p. 1283, § 66, effective June 5.

L. 2004:

(2)(c)(III.5) added, p. 1379, § 5, effective July 1.

L. 2005:

(2)(e) added, p. 646, § 12, effective May 27; (4)(a) amended, p. 1173, § 7, effective August 8.

L. 2007:

(6) amended, p. 800, § 12, effective July 1.

L. 2008:

(2)(b), IP(5)(a), (5)(a)(III), and (5)(b) amended, p. 244, § 5, effective July 1; IP(5)(a) amended and (5)(a)(V) and (5)(a)(VI) added, p. 474, § 4, effective July 1.

L. 2013:

(2)(b) and (5)(a)(III) amended, (HB 13-1325), ch. 331, p. 1879, § 5, effective May 28.

L. 2017:

(4)(e) added, (SB 17-286), ch. 388, p. 2007, § 2, effective August 9; (6) amended, (SB 17-223), ch. 158, p. 565, § 20, effective August 9.

42-2-121.5. Emergency contact information - website form - license application - driver's license database.

No later than January 1, 2009, the department shall create and make available on its official website an electronic form that allows a person with a driver's license, minor driver's license, instruction permit, or temporary driver's license issued pursuant to this part 1 or an identification card issued pursuant to part 3 of this article to input the names, addresses, and telephone numbers of up to two persons to be contacted in an emergency pursuant to subsection (3) of this section. The form shall include a statement that the information may be disclosed only to authorized law enforcement or public safety personnel for the purpose of notifying the persons listed in an emergency and a place for the person entering the information to assent to the use of the information for this purpose.

The department shall add the emergency contact information received from a person in accordance with paragraph (a) of this subsection (1) to the person's record in the driver's license database.

On and after January 1, 2009, the department shall include on the application form for a driver's license, minor driver's license, or instruction permit used pursuant to section 42-2-107, the driver's license renewal application used pursuant to section 42-2-118, the duplicate driver's license application used pursuant to section 42-2-117, and the identification card application form used pursuant to section 42-2-302 a place for the applicant to specify the names, addresses, and telephone numbers of up to two persons to be contacted in an emergency pursuant to subsection (3) of this section. The application shall include a statement that the information will be disclosed only to authorized law enforcement or public safety personnel for the purpose of notifying the persons listed in an emergency and a place for the person providing the information to assent to the use of the information for this purpose.

The department shall add the emergency contact information specified on an application in accordance with paragraph (a) of this subsection (2) to the person's record in the driver's license database.

An officer of a law enforcement or public safety agency who is authorized to access the driver's license database may obtain a person's emergency contact information from the database if the person is injured or killed as a result of an accident, criminal act, or other emergency situation. The officer may contact the persons listed in the emergency contact information and notify them of the emergency situation and the condition and location of the person who has been injured or killed.

The department shall not disclose the information received in accordance with this section to any person except as authorized by subsection (3) of this section and section 24-72-204 (7)(d), C.R.S.

Source:

L. 2008:

Entire section added, p. 1519, § 1, effective May 28.